Utah statutes.
10-7-27.   Street railway companies to restore streets.
Every street railway company shall at its own expense restore the pavement,
including the foundation thereof, of every street disturbed by it in the
construction, reconstruction, removal or repair of its tracks, to the same
condition as before the disturbance thereof, to the satisfaction of the
governing body having charge of such street. The obligation imposed hereby
shall, in cities other than cities of the first class, be in lieu and
substitution of any and all other obligations of any such company to pave,
repave or repair any street, or to pay any part of the cost thereof, and may
be enforced in the same manner as similar obligations are or may be enforced
under the laws of this state. Nothing herein contained shall be considered to
relieve any such company from the repayment of any money which has heretofore
been advanced or expended by any city for any paving heretofore done under or
by virtue of a specific contract or agreement made and entered into between
the board of commissioners or the city council of any city and such company
providing for the repayment thereof, but the obligation for such repayment
shall be and remain enforceable as if this section had not been passed.
